zspell/tests/files/w1_eng_short.aff
# This is a shortened en_US affix file
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'
ICONV 1
ICONV ’ '
NOSUGGEST !

# ordinal numbers
COMPOUNDMIN 1
# only in compounds: 1th, 2th, 3th
ONLYINCOMPOUND c
# compound rules:
# 1. [0-9]*1[0-9]th (10th, 11th, 12th, 56714th, etc.)
# 2. [0-9]*[02-9](1st|2nd|3rd|[4-9]th) (21st, 22nd, 123rd, 1234th, etc.)
COMPOUNDRULE 2
COMPOUNDRULE n*1t
COMPOUNDRULE n*mp
WORDCHARS 0123456789

PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0     re         .

SFX V N 2
SFX V   e     ive        e
SFX V   0     ive        [^e]

SFX N Y 3
SFX N   e     ion        e
SFX N   y     ication    y
SFX N   0     en         [^ey]

SFX G Y 2
SFX G   e     ing        e
SFX G   0     ing        [^e]

SFX D Y 4
SFX D   0     d          e
SFX D   y     ied        [^aeiou]y
SFX D   0     ed         [^ey]
SFX D   0     ed         [aeiou]y

SFX T N 4
SFX T   0     st         e
SFX T   y     iest       [^aeiou]y
SFX T   0     est        [aeiou]y
SFX T   0     est        [^ey]

SFX R Y 4
SFX R   0     r          e
SFX R   y     ier        [^aeiou]y
SFX R   0     er         [aeiou]y
SFX R   0     er         [^ey]

SFX S Y 4
SFX S   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX S   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX S   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX S   0     s          [^sxzhy]

SFX M Y 1
SFX M   0     's         .

REP 12
REP a ei
REP ei a
REP a ey
REP ey a
REP ai ie
REP ie ai
REP alot a_lot
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP air are
REP air ere
